California, session 20252026, AB1963.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1950.1 of the Civil Code is repealed.1950.1.(a)A reusable tenant screening report shall include all of the following information regarding an applicant:(1)Name.(2)Contact information.(3)Verification of employment.(4)Last known address.(5)Results of an eviction history check in a manner and for a period of time consistent with applicable law related to the consideration of eviction history in housing.(b)A reusable tenant screening report shall prominently state the date through which the information contained in the report is current.(c)A landlord may elect to accept reusable tenant screening reports and may require an applicant to state that there has not been a material change to the information in the reusable tenant screening report.(d)Notwithstanding Section 1950.6, if an applicant provides a reusable tenant screening report to a landlord that accepts reusable tenant screening reports, the landlord shall not charge the applicant either of the following:(1)A fee for the landlord to access the report.(2)An application screening fee.(e)As used in this section:(1)“Applicant” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1950.6.(2)“Application screening fee” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1950.6.(3)“Consumer report” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1681a of Title 15 of the United States Code.(4)“Consumer reporting agency” means a person which, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties and that uses any means or facility of interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing consumer reports.(5)“Landlord” means an owner of residential rental property or the owner’s agent.(6)“Reusable tenant screening report” means a consumer report that meets all of the following criteria:(A)Was prepared within the previous 30 days by a consumer reporting agency at the request and expense of an applicant.(B)Is made directly available to a landlord for use in the rental application process or is provided through a third-party website that regularly engages in the business of providing a reusable tenant screening report and complies with all state and federal laws pertaining to use and disclosure of information contained in a consumer report by a consumer reporting agency.(C)Is available to the landlord at no cost to access or use.(f)This section does not affect any other applicable law related to the consideration of criminal history information in housing, including, but not limited to, Article 24 (commencing with Section 12264) of Subchapter 7 of Chapter 5 of Division 4.1 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations and local ordinances governing the information that landlords may review and consider when determining to whom they will rent.(g)If an ordinance, resolution, regulation, administrative action, initiative, or other policy adopted by a city, county, or city and county conflicts with this section, the policy that provides greater protections to applicants shall apply.(h)This section does not require a landlord to accept reusable tenant screening reports.SEC. 2. Section 1950.1 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1950.1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Application requirements” means any information, documentation, fees, deposits, or other materials that a landlord requires from a prospective tenant as part of the process of considering their application for tenancy.(2) “Consumer report” has the meaning set forth in Section 1681a of Title 15 of the United States Code.(3) “Portable screening report” means a consumer report prepared by a tenant screening company, which may include information about their current ability to pay that meets all of the following criteria:(A) Be dated within 45 days of submission to the landlord.(B) Comply with all applicable federal, state, and local laws governing the content of consumer reports and tenant screening reports.(C) Be obtained with proper written authorization from the prospective tenant.(D) Cost the prospective tenant no more than forty-five dollars ($45).(4) “Tenant screening company” means a consumer reporting agency, as defined in Section 1681a of Title 15 of the United States Code, that compiles and provides portable screening reports to landlords or prospective tenants.(b) A landlord shall accept from a prospective tenant a portable screening report prepared by a tenant screening company approved by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to subdivision (g).(c) If a prospective tenant provides a portable screening report pursuant to subdivision (b), the landlord shall not do any of the following:(1) Notwithstanding Section 1950.6, charge the prospective tenant any of the following:(A) An application fee.(B) A screening fee.(C) Any fee to access, review, or process the portable screening report.(D) Any other fee associated with the rental application.(2) Require a prospective tenant to pay for or undergo an additional background check, credit check, or tenant screening.(3) Reject an application based solely on either of the following:(A) The applicant’s provision of a portable screening report pursuant to subdivision (b) rather than submitting to the landlord’s preferred screening process.(B) A score, recommendation, or rating generated by an automated system, algorithmic tool, or artificial intelligence that does not meet either of the following criteria:(i) Derived from factors empirically related to the likelihood that an applicant will fulfill the obligations of a tenancy.(ii) Tested periodically to ensure it does not produce a disparate impact on members of a protected class under applicable fair housing law. (d) A landlord shall advise a prospective tenant in an advertisement for a dwelling unit and before accepting any application materials for a dwelling unit of both of the following:(1) The landlord is required to accept portable screening reports provided by the prospective tenant pursuant to subdivision (b).(2) The landlord is prohibited from charging a prospective tenant, who provides a portable screening report pursuant to subdivision (b), any fee described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(e) If a landlord rejects an application after reviewing a portable screening report provided by the prospective tenant pursuant to subdivision (b), the landlord shall, within three business days, provide the prospective tenant with the specific reasons for rejection in writing that complies with all of the following:(1) Identify the specific criteria that were not met.(2) Comply with the adverse action notice requirements specified in Section 1681m of Title 15 of the United States Code.(3) Comply with existing, applicable fair housing and consumer protection laws.(4) Inform the prospective tenant of their right to dispute inaccurate information that was used.(f) A portable screening report may be used for multiple rental applications during its 45-day validity period.(g) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall establish and maintain a publicly accessible list of approved tenant screening companies that prepare portable screening reports, pursuant to both of the following:(1) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall review and update the list at least annually. The Department of Housing and Community Development shall remove from the list any tenant screening company that does not prepare a portable screening report that meets the requirements described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).(2) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall establish procedures for tenant screening companies to apply for approval and inclusion on the list.(h) (1) A landlord who violates this section shall be liable to the prospective tenant in a civil action for any of the following:(A) Actual damages, including, but not limited to, application fees paid, economic harm, and costs incurred for seeking alternative housing.(B) Statutory damages of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.(C) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(D) Any other relief the court deems appropriate, including injunctive relief.(2) (A) Subject to subparagraph (C), before a prospective tenant brings a civil action pursuant to paragraph (1), the prospective tenant shall give notice of the violation to the landlord, with an opportunity to cure the violation, that includes all of the following:(i) Identifies the specific provision or provisions of this section that the landlord allegedly violated.(ii) Describes the facts giving rise to the alleged violation.(iii) States that the landlord has seven calendar days to cure the violation.(B) The landlord shall not be liable to the prospective tenant for a violation of this section if the landlord does both of the following:(i) Cures the violation within seven days of receiving the notice pursuant to subparagraph (A).(ii) Pays the prospective tenant a penalty of fifty dollars ($50).(C) This paragraph applies only to a landlord’s first violation of this section with respect to a particular prospective tenant. This paragraph shall not apply to subsequent violations by the same landlord against the same prospective tenant, in which case the landlord shall be immediately subject to full liability pursuant to paragraph (1).(i) The Attorney General may bring a civil action to seek any of the following based on violations of this section:(1) Injunctive relief.(2) A civil penalty in an amount of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.(3) Restitution on behalf of affected prospective tenants.(4) Any other appropriate relief.(j) The remedies provided by this section shall be in addition to any other remedies provided by law.SEC. 3. Section 1950.3 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1950.3. (a) For the purposes of this section, “application requirements” means any information, documentation, fees, deposits, or other materials that a landlord requires from a prospective tenant as part of the process of considering their application for tenancy.(b) Before accepting any application materials, the landlord shall provide in writing a complete and itemized disclosure of all application requirements to the prospective tenant. The disclosure shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) All required documentation, including, but not limited to, proof of income, employment verification, references, and government-issued identification.(2) All minimum qualification criteria, including income thresholds and rental history requirements.(3) Any deposit required upon approval.(4) Any other terms, conditions, or criteria that may affect whether an application is approved.(5) The anticipated timeline for application processing and notification of a decision.(c) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall prepare a clear, plain-language, and standardized format for the disclosure required pursuant to subdivision (b).(d) The disclosures pursuant to subdivision (b) shall comply with all of the following:(1) Be provided in a clear, plain-language, and standardized format, as prescribed by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to subdivision (c).(2) Be made available before the prospective tenant submits any portion of an application.(3) Be publicly posted wherever the dwelling unit is advertised, including online listings.(4) Be available in the same languages in which the landlord advertises the dwelling unit.(e) After providing the disclosure pursuant to subdivision (b), a landlord shall not add, modify, or request additional application requirements from a prospective tenant, except in either of the following circumstances:(1) The prospective tenant provided materially false or incomplete information in their application.(2) The landlord discovers a bona fide error in the initial disclosure, immediately notifies all affected prospective tenants in writing, and offers each the option to withdraw their application with a full refund of any fees paid.(f) A landlord shall not deny an application based on a prospective tenant’s failure to provide an application requirement that was not disclosed pursuant to subdivision (b).(g) In addition to the remedies provided in subdivisions (i) and (j), a violation of this section shall constitute an act of unfair competition within the meaning of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.(h) The purpose of this section is to enable a prospective tenant to make a fully informed decision about whether to apply before incurring any cost or obligation. Any ambiguity in a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be construed in favor of the prospective tenant.(i) (1) A landlord who violates this section shall be liable to the prospective tenant in a civil action for any of the following:(A) Actual damages, including, but not limited to, application fees paid, economic harm, and costs incurred for seeking alternative housing.(B) Statutory damages of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.(C) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(D) Any other relief the court deems appropriate, including injunctive relief.(2) (A) Subject to subparagraph (C), before a prospective tenant brings a civil action pursuant to paragraph (1), the prospective tenant shall give notice of the violation to the landlord, with an opportunity to cure the violation, that includes all of the following:(i) Identifies the specific provision or provisions of this section that the landlord allegedly violated.(ii) Describes the facts giving rise to the alleged violation.(iii) States that the landlord has seven calendar days to cure the violation.(B) The landlord shall not be liable to the prospective tenant for a violation of this section if the landlord does both of the following:(i) Cures the violation within seven days of receiving the notice pursuant to subparagraph (A).(ii) Pays the prospective tenant a penalty of fifty dollars ($50).(C) This paragraph applies only to a landlord’s first violation of this section with respect to a particular prospective tenant. This paragraph shall not apply to subsequent violations by the same landlord against the same prospective tenant, in which case the landlord shall be immediately subject to full liability pursuant to paragraph (1).(j) The Attorney General may bring a civil action to seek any of the following based on violations of this section:(1) Injunctive relief.(2) A civil penalty of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.(3) Restitution on behalf of affected prospective tenants.(4) Any other appropriate relief.(k) The remedies provided by this section shall be in addition to any other remedies provided by law.SEC. 4. Section 50514.7 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:50514.7. The department shall post on its internet website information for prospective tenants about the requirements of Section 1950.1 of the Civil Code.SEC. 5. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SECTION 1.Section 1941.1 of the Civil Code is amended to read:1941.1.(a)A dwelling is untenantable for purposes of Section 1941 if it substantially lacks any of the following affirmative standard characteristics or is a residential unit described in Section 17920.3 or 17920.10 of the Health and Safety Code:(1)Effective waterproofing and weather protection of roof and exterior walls, including unbroken windows and doors.(2)Plumbing or gas facilities that conformed to applicable law in effect at the time of installation, maintained in good working order.(3)A water supply approved under applicable law that is under the control of the tenant, capable of producing hot and cold running water, or a system that is under the control of the landlord, that produces hot and cold running water, furnished to appropriate fixtures, and connected to a sewage disposal system approved under applicable law.(4)Heating facilities that conformed with applicable law at the time of installation, maintained in good working order.(5)Electrical lighting, with wiring and electrical equipment that conformed with applicable law at the time of installation, maintained in good working order.(6)Building, grounds, and appurtenances at the time of the commencement of the lease or rental agreement, and all areas under control of the landlord, kept in every part clean, sanitary, and free from all accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, rodents, and vermin.(7)An adequate number of appropriate receptacles for garbage and rubbish, in clean condition and good repair at the time of the commencement of the lease or rental agreement, with the landlord providing appropriate serviceable receptacles thereafter and being responsible for the clean condition and good repair of the receptacles under their control.(8)Floors, stairways, and railings maintained in good repair.(9)A locking mail receptacle for each residential unit in a residential hotel, as required by Section 17958.3 of the Health and Safety Code. This subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2008.(10)Except as provided in subdivision (b), a stove that is maintained in good working order and capable of safely generating heat for cooking purposes. A stove that is subject to a recall by the manufacturer or a public entity is not capable of safely generating heat for cooking purposes. This paragraph shall only apply to a lease entered into, amended, or extended on or after January 1, 2026.(11)(A)Except as provided in subdivision (b) and subparagraph (B), a refrigerator that is maintained in good working order and capable of safely storing food. A refrigerator that is subject to recall by the manufacturer or a public entity is not capable of safely storing food.(B)A tenant and landlord may mutually agree when the lease is signed if the tenant chooses to provide and maintain their own refrigerator, provided that all of the following apply:(i)The lease contains a statement in substantially the following form:“Under state law, the landlord is required to provide a refrigerator in good working order in your unit. By checking this box, you acknowledge that you have asked to bring your own refrigerator and that you are responsible for keeping that refrigerator in working order.”(ii)The lease provides that the tenant may, with 30 days written notice, inform the landlord that they no longer wish to keep their own refrigerator in the unit, and that at the end of the 30-day notice period, the landlord shall install a refrigerator in good working order in the unit.(iii)A landlord shall not condition a tenancy upon the tenant providing their own refrigerator.(iv)The landlord shall not be responsible for the maintenance of a refrigerator provided by the tenant.(C)This paragraph shall only apply to a lease entered into, amended, or extended on or after January 1, 2026.(b)The characteristics described in paragraphs (10) and (11) of subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following:(1)Permanent supportive housing, as that term is defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 8698.4 of the Government Code.(2)A single-room occupancy unit that provides living and sleeping space for the exclusive use of the occupant, including those in which occupants share food preparation facilities with occupants.(3)A unit in a residential hotel, as that term is defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code.(4)A dwelling unit within a housing facility that offers shared or communal kitchen spaces to its residents, including a dwelling unit within an assisted living facility.(c)(1)A landlord shall repair or replace a stove or refrigerator that is subject to recall by the manufacturer or a public entity, as described in paragraphs (10) and (11) of subdivision (a), within 30 days of receiving notice that the stove or refrigerator is subject to recall.(2)Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit a tenant from exercising any remedy authorized under Section 1942.(d)Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit a tenant or owner of rental properties from qualifying for a utility energy savings assistance program, or any other program assistance, for heating or hot water system repairs or replacement, or a combination of heating and hot water system repairs or replacements, that would achieve energy savings.